Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.205

Instructional hours.

Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definition in this section applies throughout RCW 28A.150.200 through 28A.150.295.

(1) "Instructional hours" means those hours students are provided the opportunity to engage in educational activity planned by and under the direction of school district staff, as directed by the administration and board of directors of the district, inclusive of intermissions for class changes, recess, and teacher/parent-guardian conferences that are planned and scheduled by the district for the purpose of discussing students' educational needs or progress, and exclusive of time actually spent for meals.

(2)(a) If students are provided the opportunity to engage in educational activity that is part of the regular instructional program concurrently with the consumption of breakfast, the period of time designated for student participation in breakfast after the bell, as defined in RCW 28A.235.200, must be considered instructional hours.

(b) Breakfast after the bell programs, as defined in RCW 28A.235.200, including the provision of breakfast, are not considered part of the definition or funding of the program of basic education under Article IX of the state Constitution.

[ 2018 c 8 s 5; 1992 c 141 s 502.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Short title—2018 c 8: See notes following RCW 28A.235.210.

Contingent effective date—1992 c 141 ss 502-504, 506, and 507: "Sections 502 through 504, 506, and 507 of this act shall take effect September 1, 2000. However, these sections shall not take effect if, by September 1, 2000, a law is enacted stating that a school accountability and academic assessment system is not in place." [ 1993 c 336 s 1202; 1992 c 141 s 509.] That law was not enacted by September 1, 2000.

Findings—Part headings—Severability—1992 c 141: See notes following RCW 28A.410.040.